Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.545

Washington conservation corps.

The department shall cooperate, when appropriate, as a partner in the Washington conservation corps established in chapter 43.220 RCW.

[ 2011 c 20 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 20: See note following RCW 43.220.020.

Intent—Application—2011 c 20: See RCW 43.220.905.